Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 31 FLOOD CONTROL DISTRICTS
§ 42-3127. Exclusion of a division.

The qualified electors residing in a division of a flood control district may petition the director of the department of water resources requesting to be excluded from a district. Said petition must be signed by one-third (1/3) or more of the qualified electors residing within the territory of the division and the petition must:

Show that the division either plans to join another existing district or form a new district.

Describe the impacts on the remainder of the district after the division is excluded.

Describe the benefits to the division that will result from its exclusion from the original district.

Be in proper form as required by section 42-3105, Idaho Code, to proceed with the formation of a new district or be in proper form as required by section 42-3120, Idaho Code, to proceed with the addition of the division to an already existing district.

Present an equitable division of assets and liabilities between the division and the remaining district.

Upon receipt, the director shall examine the petition, and if in proper form and if it appears that an equitable distribution of assets and liabilities can be made, the director shall proceed with the publication of notice, as described in section 42-3107, Idaho Code. The director shall, at the hearing, permit any person or corporation interested in the exclusion of the division to appear and present testimony and evidence in support of or against exclusion of the division. The director shall base his findings upon allegations in the petition, testimony and evidence presented at the hearing and any other facts necessary for the determination of the practicability and feasibility of exclusion of the division.

If the director shall recommend that a division should be excluded, he shall make and enter his findings in the form of a petition to the district court for the county in which the largest portion of the division is located. The district court may then order the exclusion of a division.

If the director shall determine that a division should not be excluded, nothing further shall be done, unless a new petition is filed in a similar manner as described above.

At such time as the division is excluded by the district court, the new district or enlargement of an existing district shall be ordered by the director in accordance with section 42-3108, Idaho Code.

The director may redivide the district from which the division was excluded in order to meet the requirements of section 42-3106, Idaho Code.

§ 42-3128. Exclusion of a division — Disbursement of assets and liabilities.

The distribution of assets and liabilities made necessary by the exclusion of a division from a flood control district pursuant to section 42-3127, Idaho Code, shall be established by decree of the district court. In order to establish the distribution of assets and liabilities between the remaining district and the excluded division, the court may consider the director’s findings and recommendations, county tax records and district records.

§ 42-3129. Petition for annexation of land.

The holder or holders of any title, or evidence of title, representing any body of lands, may file with the board of commissioners of a flood control district a petition in writing praying that said land may be annexed into the district. The petition shall be submitted on a form provided by the district. The petition shall contain a legal description of the lands proposed to be annexed and any other information the district may require, and the petitioners shall state under oath that petitioners hold title to the lands. The board may require petitioners to advance to the district sufficient money to pay the district’s estimated costs of proceedings on the petition.

§ 42-3130. Guardians and administrators may sign petition.

A guardian, executor, or administrator of an estate who is appointed as such under the laws of this state, and who, as such guardian, executor, or administrator, is entitled to the possession of the lands belonging to the estate that he represents, may, on behalf of the ward or the estate that he represents, upon being thereunto authorized by the proper court, sign and acknowledge the petition mentioned in this chapter for the change of boundaries of the district.

§ 42-3131. Notice of petition.

The district shall cause a notice of the filing of such petition to be published in the manner provided in section 42-3117, Idaho Code. The notice shall contain the names of the petitioners and a description of the lands mentioned in the petition. The notice shall provide that all persons interested in or that may be affected by the proposed annexation may appear at the office of the board, at a time named in the notice, and show cause in writing, if they have any, why the lands mentioned should not be annexed to the district.

§ 42-3132. Hearing of petition.

The board of commissioners, at the time mentioned in the notice, or at such other time to which the hearing may be adjourned, shall hear the petition and all the objections thereto. The failure of any person to appear and object shall be taken as an assent on the person’s part to a change of the boundaries of the district as prayed for in the petition, or to such a change thereof as will include a part of the lands.

§ 42-3133. Order rejecting or accepting petition.

If the board of commissioners deems a proposed annexation not to be in the best interest of the district, the board shall reject the petition. If the board deems the proposed annexation in the best interest of the district, the board may order the lands identified in the petition or some part thereof be annexed into the district. The annexation order shall describe the lands to be annexed into the district, and the board may cause a survey thereof to be made if deemed necessary. Thereafter, the annexed land shall be included within the boundaries of the district and shall be subject to such assessments from time to time as the board levies pursuant to section 42-3115, Idaho Code. The board shall state in its minutes at its next regular meeting which division in the district the annexed lands shall be included in, and, if it deems necessary, the board shall make an order redividing the district into divisions, in the same manner and to like effect, as near as may be, as provided for that purpose on the formation of the district.

§ 42-3134. Order to be recorded.

The board of commissioners shall cause a copy of the annexation order, certified by the chairman and secretary of the board, to be filed for record in the recorder’s office of the county or counties within which the annexed lands are situated, and thereupon the district shall be and remain a flood control district as fully and to every intent and purpose as if the annexed lands that are included in the district’s boundaries had been included at the original organization of the district.